Louisiana, session 2026, HB540.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 18:1463(C)(2) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1463. Political material; ethics; prohibitions
* * *
C.
* * *
(2) Whenever any person, political committee, entity, or organization makes
a disbursement for the purpose of the financing of any electioneering communication
or any digital material that refers to a legally qualified candidate for elected office
and that is broadcast within sixty days before any election in which such candidate
is on the ballot, such communication or material shall comply with the following
items under the following circumstances:
(a) If the communication or material is paid for and authorized by a
candidate, an authorized political committee of a candidate, or its agents, it shall
clearly state that the communication or material has been paid for by such authorized
political committee. The name of the political committee paying for the
communication or material shall be given in full and no acronyms shall be used.
(b) If the communication or material is paid for by other persons, but
authorized by a candidate, an authorized political committee of a candidate, or its
agents, it shall clearly state that the communication or material is paid for by such
other persons and authorized by such candidate or authorized political committee.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 540 ENROLLED
The name of the candidate or authorized political committee shall be given in full
and no acronyms shall be used.
(c) If the communication or material is not authorized by a candidate, a
political committee of a candidate, or its agents, it shall clearly state the (i) name, (ii)
physical address (not post office box), and (iii) telephone number and the world-wide
web address if available of the person, committee, entity, or organization who paid
for the communication and state that the communication or material is not authorized
by any candidate or candidate committee. The name of the payer shall be given in
full and no acronyms shall be used.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.